Nevada, session 83, AB401.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 385.112 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385.112 A plan to improve the achievement of pupils enrolled
in public schools in this State prepared pursuant to NRS 385.111
must include:
1. A review and analysis of the data upon which the report
required pursuant to NRS 385A.400 is based and a review and
analysis of any data that is more recent than the data upon which the
report is based.
2. The identification of any problems or factors common
among the school districts or charter schools in this State, as
revealed by the review and analysis.
3. Strategies based upon evidence-based research, as defined in
20 U.S.C. § 7801(21), that will strengthen the core academic
subjects, as set forth in NRS 389.018.
-
*AB401*

– 3 –
4. Strategies to improve the academic achievement of pupils
enrolled in public schools in this State, including, without limitation,
strategies to:
(a) Instruct pupils who are not achieving to their fullest
potential, including, without limitation:
(1) The curriculum appropriate to improve achievement;
(2) The manner by which the instruction will improve the
achievement and proficiency of pupils on the examinations
administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ; [and the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,
including, without limitation, the manner in which remediation will
be provided to pupils who require remediation based on the results
of an examination administered pursuant to NRS 390.610;] and
(3) An identification of the instruction and curriculum that is
specifically designed to improve the achievement and proficiency of
pupils in each group identified in the statewide system of
accountability for public schools;
(b) Improve the literacy skills of pupils;
(c) Improve the development of English language skills and
academic achievement of pupils who are English learners;
(d) Increase the rate of attendance of pupils and reduce the
number of pupils who drop out of school;
(e) Integrate technology into the instructional and administrative
programs of the school districts;
(f) Manage effectively the discipline of pupils; and
(g) Enhance the professional development offered for the
teachers and administrators employed at public schools in this State
to include the activities set forth in 20 U.S.C. § 7801(42) and to
address the specific needs of the pupils enrolled in public schools in
this State, as deemed appropriate by the State Board.
5. Strategies designed to provide to the pupils enrolled in
middle school, junior high school and high school, the teachers and
counselors who provide instruction to those pupils, and the parents
and guardians of those pupils information concerning:
(a) The requirements for admission to an institution of higher
education and the opportunities for financial aid;
(b) The availability of Governor Guinn Millennium
Scholarships pursuant to NRS 396.911 to 396.945, inclusive, and
Nevada Promise Scholarships pursuant to NRS 396.961 to
396.9685, inclusive; and
(c) The need for a pupil to make informed decisions about his or
her curriculum in middle school, junior high school and high school
in preparation for success after graduation.
-
*AB401*

– 4 –
6. An identification, by category, of the employees of the
Department who are responsible for ensuring that each provision of
the plan is carried out effectively.
7. A timeline for carrying out the plan, including, without
limitation:
(a) The rate of improvement and progress which must be
attained annually in meeting the goals and benchmarks established
by the State Board pursuant to NRS 385.113; and
(b) For each provision of the plan, a timeline for carrying out
that provision, including, without limitation, a timeline for
monitoring whether the provision is carried out effectively.
8. For each provision of the plan, measurable criteria for
determining whether the provision has contributed toward
improving the academic achievement of pupils, increasing the rate
of attendance of pupils and reducing the number of pupils who drop
out of school.
9. Strategies to improve the allocation of resources from this
State, by program and by school district, in a manner that will
improve the academic achievement of pupils. If this State has a
financial analysis program that is designed to track educational
expenditures and revenues to individual schools, the State Board
shall use that statewide program in complying with this subsection.
If a statewide program is not available, the State Board shall use the
Department’s own financial analysis program in complying with
this subsection.
10. Based upon the reallocation of resources set forth in
subsection 9, the resources available to the State Board and the
Department to carry out the plan, including, without limitation, a
budget for the overall cost of carrying out the plan.
11. A summary of the effectiveness of appropriations made by
the Legislature to improve the academic achievement of pupils and
programs approved by the Legislature to improve the academic
achievement of pupils.
12. A 5-year strategic plan which identifies the recurring issues
in improving the achievement and proficiency of pupils in this State
and which establishes strategic goals to address those issues. The 5-
year strategic plan must be:
(a) Based upon the data from previous years which is collected
by the Department for the plan developed pursuant to NRS 385.111;
and
(b) Designed to track the progress made in achieving the
strategic goals established by the Department.
13. Any additional plans addressing the achievement and
proficiency of pupils adopted by the Department.
-
*AB401*

– 5 –
Sec. 2. NRS 385A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.200 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS
385A.070 must include information on pupil achievement and
school performance, including, without limitation, pupil
achievement for each school in the district and the district as a
whole, including, without limitation, each charter school sponsored
by the district. The board of trustees of the district shall base its
report on the results of the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105 [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610] and shall compare the
results of those examinations for the school year for which the
annual report is being prepared with those of previous school years.
The report must include, for each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, and
each grade in which the examinations and assessments were
administered:
(a) The number of pupils who took the examinations and a
record of attendance for the period in which the examinations were
administered, including an explanation of any difference in the
number of pupils who took the examinations and the number of
pupils who are enrolled in the school.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, pupil achievement, reported separately by gender and
reported separately for the groups of pupils identified in the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
(c) A comparison of the achievement of pupils in each group
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools with the performance targets established for that group.
(d) The percentage of pupils who were not tested.
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.070, the percentage of pupils who were not tested, reported
separately by gender and reported separately for the groups
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(f) The most recent 3-year trend in pupil achievement in each
subject area tested and each grade level tested pursuant to NRS
390.105 , [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,] which may include
information regarding the trend in the achievement of pupils for
more than 3 years, if such information is available.
(g) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the rating of each public school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district,
-
*AB401*

– 6 –
pursuant to the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
(h) Information on whether each school in the district, including,
without limitation, each charter school sponsored by the district, has
made progress based upon the model adopted by the Department
pursuant to NRS 390.125.
(i) Information that compares the results of pupils in the school
district, including, without limitation, pupils enrolled in charter
schools sponsored by the district, with the results of pupils
throughout this State. The information required by this paragraph
must be provided in consultation with the Department to ensure the
accuracy of the comparison.
(j) For each school in the district, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district, information that
compares the results of pupils in the school with the results of pupils
throughout the school district and throughout this State. The
information required by this paragraph must be provided in
consultation with the Department to ensure the accuracy of the
comparison.
2. If the Department temporarily waives or otherwise pauses
the requirement to administer examinations that comply with 20
U.S.C. § 6311(b)(2) pursuant to subsection 6 of NRS 390.105, the
requirement of subsection 1 to include certain information in the
annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to NRS 385A.070
does not apply for the period of time that such a waiver or pause is
effective.
Sec. 3. NRS 385A.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.280 1. The annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 must include, for each school in the
district and the district as a whole, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district, information regarding
the progression of pupils who are English learners in attaining
proficiency in the English language, including, without limitation:
(a) The number and percentage of pupils who were identified as
English learners at the beginning of the school year, were
continually enrolled throughout the school year and were identified
as proficient in English by the completion of the school year;
(b) The achievement and proficiency of pupils who are English
learners in comparison to the pupils who are proficient in English;
(c) A comparison of pupils who are English learners and pupils
who are proficient in the English language in the following areas:
(1) Retention rates;
(2) Graduation rates;
(3) Dropout rates;
(4) Grade point averages; and
-
*AB401*

– 7 –
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
390.105, scores on the examinations administered pursuant to NRS
390.105 ; [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610;] and
(d) Results of the assessments and reassessments of pupils who
are English learners, reported separately by the primary language of
the pupils, pursuant to the policy developed by the board of trustees
of the school district pursuant to NRS 388.407.
2. The data reported pursuant to subparagraph (5) of paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 must be reported separately:
(a) According to subject matter areas measured using the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ; [and the
college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant to
NRS 390.610;]
(b) For pupils who are newcomers to the English language,
pupils who are short-term English learners and pupils who are long-
term English learners, as designated by regulation of the State
Board; and
(c) For middle schools, junior high schools and high schools,
according to any identified trends in the proficiency in the English
language of pupils who are English learners over the immediately
preceding 3 years.
3. In addition to including the information prescribed by this
section in the annual report of accountability prepared pursuant to
NRS 385A.070, the board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall, on or before October 1
of each year:
(a) Submit a report of the information prescribed by this section
to the Department of Education and the Director of the Legislative
Counsel Bureau for transmittal to:
(1) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Education; and
(2) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
(b) Post the report on an Internet website maintained by the
school district or charter school, as applicable.
Sec. 4. NRS 385A.290 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.290 The annual report of accountability prepared
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 must include, for each school in the
district and the district as a whole, including, without limitation,
each charter school sponsored by the district, information on pupils
enrolled in career and technical education, including, without
limitation:
1. The number of pupils enrolled in a course of career and
technical education;
-
*AB401*

– 8 –
2. The number of pupils who completed a course of career and
technical education;
3. The average daily attendance of pupils who are enrolled in a
program of career and technical education;
4. The annual rate of pupils who dropped out of school and
were enrolled in a program of career and technical education before
dropping out;
5. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who received a
standard high school diploma, an adjusted diploma or an alternative
diploma; and
6. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who did not receive a
high school diploma because the pupils failed to satisfy the
requirements of subsection 2 or 3 [or 4] of NRS 390.600 or the
criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 390.600.
Sec. 5. NRS 385A.410 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.410 Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of
NRS 390.105, the annual report of accountability prepared by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 must include information on
pupil achievement and school performance, including, without
limitation:
1. Information on the achievement of all pupils based upon the
results of the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ,
[and the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610,] reported for each school district,
including, without limitation, each charter school in the district, and
for this State as a whole.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.400, pupil achievement, reported separately by gender and
reported separately for the groups of pupils identified in the
statewide system of accountability for public schools.
3. A comparison of the achievement of pupils in each group
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools with the performance targets established for that group.
4. The percentage of all pupils who were not tested, reported
for each school district, including, without limitation, each charter
school in the district, and for this State as a whole.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 of NRS
385A.400, the percentage of pupils who were not tested, reported
separately by gender and reported separately for the groups
identified in the statewide system of accountability for public
schools.
-
*AB401*

– 9 –
6. The most recent 3-year trend in the achievement of pupils in
each subject area tested and each grade level tested pursuant to NRS
390.105 , [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,] reported for each school
district, including, without limitation, each charter school in the
district, and for this State as a whole, which may include
information regarding the trend in the achievement of pupils for
more than 3 years, if such information is available.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3 of NRS
385A.720, the rating of each public school, including, without
limitation, each charter school, pursuant to the statewide system of
accountability for public schools.
8. Information on whether each public school, including,
without limitation, each charter school, has made progress based
upon the model adopted by the Department pursuant to NRS
390.125, if applicable for the grade level of pupils enrolled at the
school.
9. Information on the results of pupils who participated in the
examinations of the National Assessment of Educational Progress
required pursuant to NRS 390.830.
Sec. 6. NRS 385A.480 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.480 The annual report of accountability prepared by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 must include for each
school district, including, without limitation, each charter school in
the district, and for this State as a whole, information concerning
pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price breakfasts pursuant
to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1771 et seq. and pupils who are eligible for free or
reduced-price lunches pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 1751 et seq.,
including, without limitation:
1. The number and percentage of pupils who are eligible for
free or reduced-price breakfasts;
2. The number and percentage of pupils who receive free and
reduced-price breakfasts;
3. The number and percentage of pupils who are eligible for
free or reduced-price lunches;
4. The number and percentage of pupils who receive free and
reduced-price lunches;
5. A comparison of the achievement and proficiency of pupils,
reported separately by race and ethnicity, who are eligible for free or
reduced-price breakfasts, pupils who receive free and reduced-price
breakfasts, pupils who are eligible for free or reduced-price lunches,
pupils who receive free and reduced-price lunches and pupils who
are not eligible for free or reduced-price breakfasts or lunches;
6. A comparison of pupils, reported separately by race and
ethnicity, who are eligible for free or reduced-price breakfasts,
-
*AB401*

– 10 –
pupils who receive free and reduced-price breakfasts, pupils who are
eligible for free or reduced-price lunches and pupils who receive
free and reduced-price lunches for which data is required to be
collected in the following areas:
(a) Retention rates;
(b) Graduation rates;
(c) Dropout rates;
(d) Grade point averages; and
(e) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
390.105, scores on the examinations administered pursuant to NRS
390.105 . [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610.]
Sec. 7. NRS 385A.490 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.490 1. The annual report of accountability prepared by
the State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 must include for each
school district, including, without limitation, each charter school in
the district, and for this State as a whole, information regarding the
progression of pupils who are English learners in attaining
proficiency in the English language, including, without limitation:
(a) The number and percentage of pupils who were identified as
English learners at the beginning of the school year, were
continually enrolled throughout the school year and were identified
as proficient in English by the completion of the school year;
(b) The achievement and proficiency of pupils who are English
learners in comparison to the pupils who are proficient in English;
(c) A comparison of pupils who are English learners and pupils
who are proficient in the English language in the following areas:
(1) Retention rates;
(2) Graduation rates;
(3) Dropout rates;
(4) Grade point averages; and
(5) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6 of NRS
390.105, scores on the examinations administered pursuant to NRS
390.105 ; [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610;] and
(d) Results of the assessments and reassessments of pupils who
are English learners, reported separately by the primary language of
the pupils, pursuant to the policies developed by the boards of
trustees of school districts pursuant to NRS 388.407.
2. The data reported pursuant to subparagraph (5) of paragraph
(c) of subsection 1 must be reported separately:
(a) According to subject matter areas measured using the
examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ; [and the
college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant to
NRS 390.610;]
-
*AB401*

– 11 –
(b) For pupils who are newcomers to the English language,
pupils who are short-term English learners and pupils who are long-
term English learners, as designated by regulation of the State
Board; and
(c) For middle schools, junior high schools and high schools,
according to any identified trends in the proficiency in the English
language of pupils who are English learners over the immediately
preceding 3 years.
Sec. 8. NRS 385A.500 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.500 The annual report of accountability prepared by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 must include for each
school district, including, without limitation, each charter school in
the district and for this State as a whole, information on pupils
enrolled in career and technical education, including, without
limitation:
1. The number of pupils enrolled in a course of career and
technical education;
2. The number of pupils who completed a course of career and
technical education;
3. The average daily attendance of pupils who are enrolled in a
program of career and technical education;
4. The annual rate of pupils who dropped out of school and
were enrolled in a program of career and technical education before
dropping out;
5. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who received a
standard high school diploma, an adjusted diploma or an alternative
diploma; and
6. The number and percentage of pupils who completed a
program of career and technical education and who did not receive a
high school diploma because the pupils failed to satisfy the
requirements of subsection 2 or 3 [or 4] of NRS 390.600 or the
criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 of
NRS 390.600.
Sec. 9. NRS 385A.610 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.610 1. The Department shall establish a monitoring
system for the statewide system of accountability. The monitoring
system must identify significant levels of achievement of pupils on
the examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ,
[and the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610,] identified by school and by school
district.
2. On or before October 1 of each year, the Department shall
prepare a written summary of the findings made pursuant to
subsection 1. The written summary must be provided to:
-
*AB401*

– 12 –
(a) The Committee; and
(b) If the findings show inconsistencies applicable to a particular
school district or school within a school district, the board of
trustees of that school district.
3. The Committee shall review the report submitted pursuant to
subsection 2 and take such action as it deems appropriate.
Sec. 10. NRS 385A.620 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.620 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that
prescribe, consistent with 20 U.S.C. §§ 6301 et seq., and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto, the manner in which pupils
enrolled in:
(a) A program of distance education pursuant to NRS 388.820 to
388.874, inclusive;
(b) An alternative program for the education of pupils at risk of
dropping out of school pursuant to NRS 388.537; or
(c) A program of education that:
(1) Primarily serves pupils with disabilities; or
(2) Is operated within a:
(I) Local, regional or state facility for the detention of
children;
(II) Juvenile forestry camp;
(III) Child welfare agency; or
(IV) Correctional institution,
 will be included within the statewide system of accountability set
forth in this chapter.
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must also
set forth the manner in which:
(a) The progress of pupils enrolled in a program of distance
education, an alternative program or a program of education
described in subsection 1 will be accounted for within the statewide
system of accountability; and
(b) The results of pupils enrolled in a program of distance
education, an alternative program or a program of education
described in subsection 1 on the examinations administered pursuant
to NRS 390.105 [and, if applicable for the grade levels of the pupils
enrolled, the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610] will be reported.
Sec. 11. NRS 385A.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
385A.730 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that
prescribe an alternative performance framework to evaluate public
schools that are approved pursuant to NRS 385A.740. Such
regulations must include, without limitation, an alternative manner
in which to evaluate such a school and the manner in which the
school will be included within the statewide system of
accountability set forth in this chapter.
-
*AB401*

– 13 –
2. The regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must also
set forth the manner in which:
(a) The progress of pupils enrolled in a public school for which
an alternative performance framework has been approved pursuant
to NRS 385A.740 will be accounted for within the statewide system
of accountability; and
(b) To report the results of pupils enrolled in such a public
school on the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 .
[and, if applicable for the grade levels of the pupils enrolled, the
college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant to
NRS 390.610.]
Sec. 12. NRS 388.205 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.205 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall
adopt a policy for each public school in the school district in which
ninth grade pupils are enrolled to develop a 4-year academic plan
for each of those pupils. Except as otherwise provided in subsection
4, the policy must require each public school to provide each pupil
with an academic plan at the beginning of the pupil’s ninth grade
year. The academic plan must set forth the specific educational
goals established pursuant to subsection 7 each year and the steps
that the pupil intends to take in order to achieve those goals. The
plan may include, without limitation, the designation of a career
pathway and enrollment in dual credit courses, career and technical
education courses, advanced placement courses and honors courses.
2. The policy must ensure that each pupil enrolled in ninth
grade and the pupil’s parent or legal guardian are provided with, to
the extent practicable, information regarding:
(a) The advanced placement courses, honors courses,
international baccalaureate courses, dual credit courses, career and
technical education courses, including, without limitation, career
and technical skills-building programs, and any other educational
programs, pathways or courses available to the pupil which will
assist the pupil in the advancement of his or her education;
(b) The requirements for graduation from high school with a
diploma and the types of diplomas available;
(c) The requirements for admission to the Nevada System of
Higher Education, including, without limitation, [the average score
on the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610 of students admitted to each community
college, state college or university in the Nevada System of Higher
Education, and] the eligibility requirements for a Governor Guinn
Millennium Scholarship;
(d) The Free Application for Federal Student Aid and advice
concerning how to finance enrollment in an institution that provides
postsecondary and vocational education; and
-
*AB401*

– 14 –
(e) The charter schools within the school district.
3. The policy required by subsection 1 must require each pupil
enrolled in ninth grade and the pupil’s parent or legal guardian to:
(a) Be notified of opportunities to work in consultation with a
school counselor to develop and review an academic plan for the
pupil;
(b) Sign the academic plan; and
(c) Review the academic plan at least once each school year in
consultation with a school counselor and revise the plan if
necessary.
4. If a pupil enrolls in a high school after ninth grade, an
academic plan must be developed for that pupil as soon as
reasonably practicable with appropriate modifications for the grade
level of the pupil.
5. If an academic plan for a pupil includes enrollment in a dual
credit course, the plan must address how the dual credit course will
enable the pupil to achieve his or her postgraduation goals.
6. An academic plan for a pupil must be used as a guide for the
pupil and the parent or legal guardian of the pupil to plan, monitor
and manage the pupil’s educational and occupational development
and make determinations of the appropriate courses of study for the
pupil. If a pupil does not satisfy all the goals set forth in the
academic plan, the pupil is eligible to graduate and receive a high
school diploma if the pupil otherwise satisfies the requirements for a
diploma.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a school
counselor shall establish specific educational goals for each pupil in
consultation with the pupil and the parent or legal guardian of the
pupil, to the extent practicable, at the beginning of each pupil’s
ninth grade year and as a part of the review conducted pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 3.
8. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must require
each public school in the school district to:
(a) Develop a procedure to identify a homeless pupil,
unaccompanied pupil or pupil who lives in foster care; and
(b) Review the academic plan for each such pupil and adjust the
plan as appropriate to maximize the accrual of credits by the pupil
and the progress of the pupil towards graduation.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Foster care” has the meaning ascribed to it in 45 C.F.R.
§ 1355.20.
(b) “Homeless pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the term
“homeless children and youths” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(2).
(c) “Unaccompanied pupil” has the meaning ascribed to the term
“unaccompanied youth” in 42 U.S.C. § 11434a(6).
-
*AB401*

– 15 –
Sec. 13. NRS 388.208 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.208 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
the board of trustees of each school district shall adopt a policy for
each public high school in the school district to ensure that a
counselor, administrator or other licensed educational personnel
from the public high school meets individually at least once each
school year with each pupil enrolled in grades 9, 10, 11 and 12 in
the public high school to review with the pupil the academic plan
developed for the pupil pursuant to NRS 388.205. The parent or
guardian of a pupil may elect to waive the requirements of this
subsection on behalf of the pupil.
2. At a meeting conducted pursuant to subsection 1, the
counselor, administrator or other licensed educational personnel
must use [the results of the pupil’s college and career readiness
assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610, if the results of
the assessment are available at the time of the meeting,] the results
of a preliminary National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test, if the
results of the test are available at the time of the meeting, and the
pupil’s academic records, to review with the pupil the areas of his or
her academic strengths and weaknesses, including, without
limitation, areas where additional work in the subject areas tested on
the assessment or test, as applicable, is necessary to prepare the
pupil for college and career success without the need for
remediation.
3. If it is determined that the pupil requires remediation, the
counselor, administrator or other licensed educational personnel
must coordinate with the pupil and the pupil’s parent or legal
guardian to revise the academic plan for the pupil to ensure that the
pupil is prepared for college and career success before he or she
graduates.
Sec. 14. NRS 388.227 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.227 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall,
and the governing body of each charter school that operates as a
high school and is in good standing with its sponsor may, adopt a
policy to authorize the establishment of individual graduation plans
for pupils enrolled in a high school within the school district or
operated by the charter school, as applicable, who:
(a) Are deficient in credits and not likely to graduate according
to schedule; or
(b) [Have performed poorly on the college and career readiness
assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610; or
(c)] Have attended or will attend school in another country as a
foreign exchange student for at least one semester.
2. In addition to the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) [, (b)]
and [(c)] (b) of subsection 1, the Superintendent of Public
-
*AB401*

– 16 –
Instruction may establish other conditions for a pupil to be eligible
for an individual graduation plan.
3. An individual graduation plan must establish an academic
plan for a pupil to allow the pupil to graduate with a standard high
school diploma not later than 3 semesters after the date on which the
pupil was otherwise scheduled to graduate. The individual
graduation plan must include any conditions to which a pupil must
agree to comply to remain enrolled in the high school. Such
conditions may include, without limitation, any subjects that must
be completed, the minimum number of units of credit in which the
pupil must enroll each semester, the minimum grade point average
that must be maintained by the pupil and any other conditions
necessary to ensure that the pupil makes adequate progress to obtain
a standard high school diploma within the time allowed.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall make a
determination each year concerning:
(a) The number of credits by which a pupil must be deficient to
be eligible for an individual graduation plan; and
(b) [The maximum score on the college and career readiness
assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610 that a pupil may
receive to be eligible for an individual graduation plan; and
(c)] Any other conditions that must be met for participation in
an individual graduation plan.
5. An individual graduation plan may be withdrawn by the
school district or charter school if the pupil is not making adequate
progress as outlined in the individual graduation plan or for other
good cause.
6. A pupil for whom an individual graduation plan has been
established must be counted when calculating the graduation rates of
pupils in the annual report of accountability for the school district or
charter school in which the pupil is enrolled pursuant to NRS
385A.070 and the annual report of accountability prepared by the
State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 for the year in which the
pupil was scheduled to graduate until the pupil obtains a standard
high school diploma and then must be counted for the appropriate
year as determined by the Department pursuant to subsection 8.
7. A pupil for whom an individual graduation plan has been
established must not be counted when calculating the graduation
rates of pupils used to determine whether the sponsor of a charter
school may take certain actions concerning the charter school
pursuant to NRS 388A.330.
8. If a pupil for whom an individual graduation plan has been
established:
(a) Obtains a standard high school diploma within the time
allowed by the individual graduation plan, the pupil must be counted
-
*AB401*

– 17 –
as having received a standard high school diploma when calculating
the graduation rates of pupils for the purposes of NRS 388A.330, if
applicable, in the annual report of accountability for the school
district or charter school in which the pupil is enrolled pursuant to
NRS 385A.070 and the annual report of accountability prepared by
the State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 for the year in which the
pupil graduates.
(b) Fails to obtain a standard high school diploma within the
time allowed by the individual graduation plan, the pupil must be
counted as having failed to receive a standard high school diploma
when calculating the graduation rates of pupils for the purpose of
NRS 388A.330, if applicable, in the annual report of accountability
for the school district or charter school in which the pupil is enrolled
pursuant to NRS 385A.070 and the annual report of accountability
prepared by the State Board pursuant to NRS 385A.400 for the year
in which the pupil was scheduled to graduate pursuant to his or her
individual graduation plan.
9. [Any pupil for whom an individual graduation plan has been
established who receives a score on the college and career readiness
assessment that is less than the score prescribed by the
Superintendent of Public Instruction pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 4 must, unless his or her individual graduation plan
provides otherwise, enroll in the maximum number of units of credit
per semester allowed by the public school in which the pupil is
enrolled.
10.] For the purposes of this section, a charter school for which
the governing body has been reconstituted or the charter contract
terminated or restarted in accordance with NRS 388A.285,
388A.300 or 388A.330, as applicable, shall not be deemed to be in
good standing unless the charter school is carrying out an
improvement plan approved by the sponsor of the charter school and
incorporated into the charter contract.
Sec. 15. NRS 388.283 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.283 1. “School service” means an Internet website,
online service or mobile application that:
(a) Collects or maintains personally identifiable information
concerning a pupil;
(b) Is used primarily for educational purposes; and
(c) Is designed and marketed for use in public schools and is
used at the direction of teachers and other educational personnel.
2. The term does not include:
(a) An Internet website, online service or mobile application that
is designed or marketed for use by a general audience, even if the
school service is also marketed to public schools;
-
*AB401*

– 18 –
(b) An internal database, system or program maintained or
operated by a school district, charter school or university school for
profoundly gifted pupils;
(c) A school service for which a school service provider has:
(1) Been designated by a school district, the sponsor of a
charter school, the governing body of a university school for
profoundly gifted pupils or the Department as a school official
pursuant to the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974,
20 U.S.C. § 1232g;
(2) Entered into a contract with the school district, the
sponsor of a charter school, the governing body of a university
school for profoundly gifted pupils or the Department; and
(3) Agreed to comply with and be subject to the provisions of
the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974, 20 U.S.C. §
1232g, relating to personally identifiable information;
(d) Any examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ;
[or the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610;] or
(e) Any instructional programs purchased by a school district, a
charter school, the governing body of a university school for
profoundly gifted pupils or the Department.
Sec. 16. NRS 388.874 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.874 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that
prescribe:
(a) The process for submission of an application by a person or
entity for inclusion of a course of distance education on the list
prepared by the Department pursuant to NRS 388.834 and the
contents of the application;
(b) The process for submission of an application by the board of
trustees of a school district, the governing body of a charter school
or a committee to form a charter school to provide a program of
distance education and the contents of the application;
(c) The qualifications and conditions for enrollment that a pupil
must satisfy to enroll in a program of distance education, consistent
with NRS 388.850 and any other applicable statute;
(d) A method for reporting to the Department the number of
pupils who are enrolled in a program of distance education and the
attendance of those pupils;
(e) The requirements for assessing the achievement of pupils
who are enrolled in a program of distance education, which must
include, without limitation, the administration of the examinations
required pursuant to NRS 390.105 ; [and, if applicable for the grade
levels of the pupils enrolled, the college and career readiness
assessment pursuant to NRS 390.610;] and
-
*AB401*

– 19 –
(f) A written description of the process pursuant to which the
State Board may revoke its approval for the operation of a program
of distance education.
2. The State Board may adopt regulations as it determines are
necessary to carry out the provisions of NRS 388.820 to 388.874,
inclusive.
Sec. 17. NRS 388A.366 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.366 1. A charter school shall:
(a) Comply with all laws and regulations relating to
discrimination and civil rights.
(b) Remain nonsectarian, including, without limitation, in its
educational programs, policies for admission and employment
practices.
(c) Refrain from charging tuition or fees, except for tuition or
fees that the board of trustees of a school district is authorized to
charge, levying taxes or issuing bonds.
(d) Comply with any plan for desegregation ordered by a court
that is in effect in the school district in which the charter school is
located.
(e) Comply with the provisions of chapter 241 of NRS.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, schedule and
provide annually at least as many days of instruction as are required
of other public schools located in the same school district as the
charter school is located. The governing body of a charter school
may submit a written request to the Superintendent of Public
Instruction for a waiver from providing the days of instruction
required by this paragraph. The Superintendent of Public Instruction
may grant such a request if the governing body demonstrates to the
satisfaction of the Superintendent that:
(1) Extenuating circumstances exist to justify the waiver; and
(2) The charter school will provide at least as many hours or
minutes of instruction as would be provided under a program
consisting of 180 days.
(g) Cooperate with the board of trustees of the school district in
the administration of the examinations administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105 [and, if the charter school enrolls pupils at a high
school grade level, the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610] to the pupils who are
enrolled in the charter school.
(h) Comply with applicable statutes and regulations governing
the achievement and proficiency of pupils in this State.
(i) Provide instruction in the core academic subjects set forth in
subsection 1 of NRS 389.018, as applicable for the grade levels of
pupils who are enrolled in the charter school, and provide at least
the courses of study that are required of pupils by statute or
-
*AB401*

– 20 –
regulation for promotion to the next grade or graduation from a
public high school and require the pupils who are enrolled in the
charter school to take those courses of study. This paragraph does
not preclude a charter school from offering, or requiring the pupils
who are enrolled in the charter school to take, other courses of study
that are required by statute or regulation.
(j) If the parent or legal guardian of a child submits an
application to enroll in kindergarten, first grade or second grade at
the charter school, comply with NRS 392.040 regarding the ages for
enrollment in those grades.
(k) Refrain from using public money to purchase real property
or buildings without the approval of the sponsor.
(l) Hold harmless, indemnify and defend the sponsor of the
charter school against any claim or liability arising from an act or
omission by the governing body of the charter school or an
employee or officer of the charter school. An action at law may not
be maintained against the sponsor of a charter school for any cause
of action for which the charter school has obtained liability
insurance.
(m) Provide written notice to the parents or legal guardians of
pupils in grades 9 to 12, inclusive, who are enrolled in the charter
school of whether the charter school is accredited by the Northwest
Accreditation Commission.
(n) Adopt a final budget in accordance with the regulations
adopted by the Department. A charter school is not required to adopt
a final budget pursuant to NRS 354.598 or otherwise comply with
the provisions of chapter 354 of NRS.
(o) If the charter school provides a program of distance
education pursuant to NRS 388.820 to 388.874, inclusive, comply
with all statutes and regulations that are applicable to a program of
distance education for purposes of the operation of the program.
2. A charter school shall not provide instruction through a
program of distance education to children who are exempt from
compulsory enrollment and attendance pursuant to NRS 392.070.
As used in this subsection, “distance education” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 388.826.
Sec. 18. NRS 388A.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388A.405 1. To the extent money is available from
legislative appropriation or otherwise, a charter school may apply to
the Department for money for facilities if:
(a) The charter school has been operating in this State for at
least 5 consecutive years and is in good financial standing;
(b) Each financial audit and each performance audit of the
charter school required by the Department pursuant to
NRS 388A.105 or 388A.110 contains no major notations,
-
*AB401*

– 21 –
corrections or errors concerning the charter school for at least 5
consecutive years;
(c) The charter school has met or exceeded the school
achievement targets and performance targets established pursuant to
the statewide system of accountability for public schools or has
demonstrated improvement in the achievement of pupils enrolled in
the charter school, as indicated by those school achievement targets
and performance targets, for the majority of the years of its
operation; and
(d) At least 75 percent of the pupils enrolled in grade 12 in the
charter school in the immediately preceding school year have
satisfied the requirements of subsection 2 or 3 [or 4] of NRS
390.600 or the criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 of NRS 390.600, if the charter school enrolls pupils at
a high school grade level.
2. A charter school that satisfies the requirements of subsection
1 shall submit to a performance audit as required by the Department
one time every 3 years. The sponsor of the charter school and the
Department shall not request a performance audit of the charter
school more frequently than every 3 years without reasonable
evidence of noncompliance in achieving the educational goals and
objectives of the charter school based upon the annual report
submitted to the Department pursuant to NRS 388A.351. If the
charter school no longer satisfies the requirements of subsection 1 or
if reasonable evidence of noncompliance in achieving the
educational goals and objectives of the charter school exists based
upon the annual report, the charter school shall, upon written notice
from the sponsor, submit to an annual performance audit.
Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (b) of subsection 1,
such a charter school:
(a) May, after undergoing the annual performance audit, reapply
to the sponsor to determine whether the charter school satisfies the
requirements of paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) of subsection 1.
(b) Is not eligible for any available money pursuant to
subsection 1 until the sponsor determines that the charter school
satisfies the requirements of that subsection.
3. A charter school that does not satisfy the requirements of
subsection 1 shall submit a quarterly report of the financial status of
the charter school if requested by the sponsor of the charter school.
Sec. 19. NRS 388C.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388C.120 1. A university school for profoundly gifted pupils
shall determine the eligibility of a pupil for admission to the school
based upon a comprehensive assessment of the pupil’s potential for
academic and intellectual achievement at the school, including,
without limitation, intellectual and academic ability, motivation,
-
*AB401*

– 22 –
emotional maturity and readiness for the environment of an
accelerated educational program. The assessment must be conducted
by a broad-based committee of professionals in the field of
education.
2. A person who wishes to apply for admission to a university
school for profoundly gifted pupils must:
(a) Submit to the governing body of the school:
(1) A completed application;
(2) Evidence that the applicant possesses advanced
intellectual and academic ability, including, without limitation,
proof that he or she satisfies the requirements of NRS 388C.030;
(3) At least three letters of recommendation from teachers or
mentors familiar with the academic and intellectual ability of the
applicant;
(4) A transcript from each school previously attended by the
applicant; and
(5) Such other information as may be requested by the
university school or governing body of the school.
(b) If requested by the governing body of the school, participate
in an on-campus interview.
3. The curriculum developed for pupils in a university school
for profoundly gifted pupils must provide exposure to the subject
areas required of pupils enrolled in other public schools.
4. The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall, upon
recommendation of the governing body, issue a high school diploma
to a pupil who is enrolled in a university school for profoundly
gifted pupils if that pupil:
(a) Satisfies the requirements of subsection 2 or 3 [or 4] of NRS
390.600; or
(b) Satisfies the criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant
to subsection 1 of NRS 390.600, successfully passes the courses in
American government and American history as required by NRS
389.054 and 389.057 and successfully completes any requirements
established by the State Board of Education for graduation from
high school.
5. On or before March 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
governing body of a university school for profoundly gifted pupils
shall prepare and submit to the Superintendent of Public Instruction,
the president of the university where the university school for
profoundly gifted pupils is located, the State Board and the Director
of the Legislative Counsel Bureau a report that contains information
regarding the school, including, without limitation, the process used
by the school to identify and recruit profoundly gifted pupils from
diverse backgrounds and with diverse talents, and data assessing the
success of the school in meeting the educational needs of its pupils.
-
*AB401*

– 23 –
Sec. 20. NRS 388G.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.120 1. Each empowerment plan for a school must:
(a) Set forth the manner by which the school will be governed;
(b) Set forth the proposed budget for the school, including,
without limitation, the cost of carrying out the empowerment plan,
and the manner by which the money apportioned to the school will
be administered;
(c) Prescribe the academic plan for the school, including,
without limitation, the manner by which courses of study will be
provided to the pupils enrolled in the school and any special
programs that will be offered for pupils;
(d) Prescribe the manner by which the achievement of pupils
will be measured and reported for the school, including, without
limitation, the results of the pupils on the examinations administered
pursuant to NRS 390.105 ; [and, if applicable for the grade levels of
the empowerment school, the college and career readiness
assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610;]
(e) Prescribe the manner by which teachers and other licensed
educational personnel will be selected and hired for the school,
which must be determined and negotiated pursuant to chapter 288 of
NRS;
(f) Prescribe the manner by which all other staff for the school
will be selected and hired, which must be determined and negotiated
pursuant to chapter 288 of NRS;
(g) Indicate whether the empowerment plan will offer an
incentive pay structure for staff and a description of that pay
structure, if applicable;
(h) Indicate the intended ratio of pupils to teachers at the school,
designated by grade level, which must comply with NRS 388.700 or
388.720, as applicable;
(i) Provide a description of the professional development that
will be offered to the teachers and other licensed educational
personnel employed at the school;
(j) Prescribe the manner by which the empowerment plan will
increase the involvement of parents and legal guardians of pupils
enrolled in the school;
(k) Comply with the plan to improve the achievement of the
pupils enrolled in the school prepared pursuant to NRS 385A.650;
(l) Address the specific educational needs and concerns of the
pupils who are enrolled in the school; and
(m) Set forth the calendar and schedule for the school.
2. If the empowerment plan includes an incentive pay structure,
that pay structure must:
(a) Provide an incentive for all staff employed at the school;
-
*AB401*

– 24 –
(b) Set forth the standards that must be achieved by the pupils
enrolled in the school and any other measurable objectives that must
be met to be eligible for incentive pay; and
(c) Be in addition to the salary or hourly rate of pay negotiated
pursuant to chapter 288 of NRS that is otherwise payable to the
employee.
3. An empowerment plan may:
(a) Request a waiver from a statute contained in this title or a
regulation of the State Board or the Department.
(b) Identify the services of the school district which the school
wishes to receive, including, without limitation, professional
development, transportation, food services and discretionary
services. Upon approval of the empowerment plan, the school
district may deduct from the total apportionment to the
empowerment school the costs of such services.
4. For purposes of determining the budget pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1, if a public school which converts to
an empowerment school is a:
(a) Charter school, the amount of the budget is the amount equal
to the apportionments and allowances from the State Education
Fund pursuant to NRS 387.121 to 387.12468, inclusive, and its
proportionate share of any other money available from federal, state
or local sources that the school or the pupils enrolled in the school
are eligible to receive.
(b) Public school, other than a charter school, the empowerment
team for the school shall have discretion of 90 percent of the amount
of money from the state financial aid and local funds that the school
district apportions for the school, without regard to any line-item
specifications or specific uses determined advisable by the school
district, unless the empowerment team determines that a lesser
amount is necessary to carry out the empowerment plan.
Sec. 21. NRS 388G.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388G.210 1. Except as otherwise provided pursuant to a
waiver granted in accordance with NRS 388G.130 or 388G.140,
each empowerment school, each person employed by an
empowerment school and each pupil enrolled in an empowerment
school shall comply with the applicable requirements of state law,
including, without limitation, the standards of content and
performance prescribed pursuant to NRS 389.520 and the
examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 . [and
the college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant
to NRS 390.610.]
2. Each empowerment school may accept gifts, grants and
donations from any source for the support of its empowerment plan.
A person who gives a gift, grant or donation may designate all or
-
*AB401*

– 25 –
part of the gift, grant or donation specifically to carry out the
incentive pay structure of the school, if applicable.
Sec. 22. NRS 390.015 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.015 The board of trustees of each school district shall
maintain on its Internet website, and shall post in a timely manner,
all pertinent information concerning the examinations and
assessments available to children who reside in the school district,
including, without limitation, the dates and times of, and contact
information concerning, such examinations and assessments. The
examinations and assessments posted must include, without
limitation [:
1. The college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610.
2. All other] , all college entrance examinations offered in this
State, including, without limitation, the Scholastic Aptitude Test, the
American College Test, the Preliminary Scholastic Aptitude Test
and the National Merit Scholarship Qualifying Test.
Sec. 23. NRS 390.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.255 “Irregularity in testing administration” means the
failure to administer an examination to pupils pursuant to NRS
390.105 [or the college and career readiness assessment pursuant to
NRS 390.610] in the manner intended by the person or entity that
created the examination . [or assessment.]
Sec. 24. NRS 390.260 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.260 “Irregularity in testing security” means an act or
omission that tends to corrupt or impair the security of an
examination administered to pupils pursuant to NRS 390.105 , [or
the college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant
to NRS 390.610,] including, without limitation:
1. The failure to comply with security procedures adopted
pursuant to NRS 390.270 or 390.275;
2. The disclosure of questions or answers to questions on an
examination [or assessment] in a manner not otherwise approved by
law; and
3. Other breaches in the security or confidentiality of the
questions or answers to questions on an examination . [or
assessment.]
Sec. 25. NRS 390.270 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.270 1. The Department shall, by regulation or otherwise,
adopt and enforce a plan setting forth procedures to ensure the
security of examinations that are administered to pupils pursuant to
NRS 390.105 . [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610.]
2. A plan adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
-
*AB401*

– 26 –
(a) Procedures pursuant to which pupils, school officials and
other persons may, and are encouraged to, report irregularities in
testing administration and testing security.
(b) Procedures necessary to ensure the security of test materials
and the consistency of testing administration.
(c) Procedures that specifically set forth the action that must be
taken in response to a report of an irregularity in testing
administration or testing security and the actions that must be taken
during an investigation of such an irregularity. For each action that
is required, the procedures must identify:
(1) By category, the employees of the school district, charter
school or Department, or any combination thereof, who are
responsible for taking the action; and
(2) Whether the school district, charter school or
Department, or any combination thereof, is responsible for ensuring
that the action is carried out successfully.
(d) Objective criteria that set forth the conditions under which a
school, including, without limitation, a charter school or a school
district, or both, is required to file a plan for corrective action in
response to an irregularity in testing administration or testing
security for the purposes of NRS 390.295.
3. The Department shall post a copy of the plan adopted
pursuant to this section and the procedures set forth therein on the
Internet website maintained by the Department.
Sec. 26. NRS 390.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.275 1. The board of trustees of each school district shall,
for each public school in the district, including, without limitation,
charter schools, adopt and enforce a plan setting forth procedures to
ensure the security of examinations . [and assessments.]
2. A plan adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Procedures pursuant to which pupils, school officials and
other persons may, and are encouraged to, report irregularities in
testing administration and testing security.
(b) Procedures necessary to ensure the security of test materials
and the consistency of testing administration.
(c) With respect to secondary schools, procedures pursuant to
which the school district or charter school, as appropriate, will
verify the identity of pupils taking an examination . [or assessment.]
(d) Procedures that specifically set forth the action that must be
taken in response to a report of an irregularity in testing
administration or testing security and the action that must be taken
during an investigation of such an irregularity. For each action that
is required, the procedures must identify, by category, the
employees of the school district or charter school who are
-
*AB401*

– 27 –
responsible for taking the action and for ensuring that the action is
carried out successfully.
 The procedures adopted pursuant to this subsection must be
consistent, to the extent applicable, with the procedures adopted by
the Department pursuant to NRS 390.270.
3. A copy of each plan adopted pursuant to this section and the
procedures set forth therein must be submitted on or before
September 1 of each year to:
(a) The State Board; and
(b) The Joint Interim Standing Committee on Education, created
pursuant to NRS 218E.320.
4. On or before September 30 of each school year, the board of
trustees of each school district and the governing body of each
charter school shall provide a written notice regarding the
examinations [and assessments] to all teachers and educational
personnel employed by the school district or governing body, all
personnel employed by the school district or governing body who
are involved in the administration of the examinations , [and
assessments,] all pupils who are required to take the examinations
[or assessments] and all parents and legal guardians of such pupils.
The written notice must be prepared in a format that is easily
understood and must include, without limitation, a description of
the:
(a) Plan adopted pursuant to this section; and
(b) Action that may be taken against personnel and pupils for
violations of the plan or for other irregularities in testing
administration or testing security.
5. As used in this section:
(a) [“Assessment” means the college and career readiness
assessment administered to pupils enrolled in grade 11 pursuant to
NRS 390.610.
(b)] “Examination” means:
(1) The examinations that are administered to pupils pursuant
to NRS 390.105; and
(2) Any other examinations which measure the achievement
and proficiency of pupils and which are administered to pupils on a
district-wide basis.
[(c)] (b) “Irregularity in testing administration” means the
failure to administer an examination [or assessment] in the manner
intended by the person or entity that created the examination . [or
assessment.
(d)] (c) “Irregularity in testing security” means an act or
omission that tends to corrupt or impair the security of an
examination , [or assessment,] including, without limitation:
-
*AB401*

– 28 –
(1) The failure to comply with security procedures adopted
pursuant to this section or NRS 390.270;
(2) The disclosure of questions or answers to questions on an
examination [or assessment] in a manner not otherwise approved by
law; and
(3) Other breaches in the security or confidentiality of the
questions or answers to questions on an examination . [or
assessment.]
Sec. 27. NRS 390.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.280 1. If the Department:
(a) Has reason to believe that a violation of the plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 390.270 may have occurred;
(b) Has reason to believe that a violation of the plan adopted
pursuant to NRS 390.275 may have occurred with respect to an
examination that is administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ; [or the
college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant to
NRS 390.610;] or
(c) Receives a request pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph
(b) of subsection 1 of NRS 390.285 to investigate a potential
violation of the plan adopted pursuant to NRS 390.275 with respect
to an examination that is administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 ,
[or the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610,]
 the Department shall investigate the matter as it deems
appropriate.
2. If the Department investigates a matter pursuant to
subsection 1, the Department may issue a subpoena to compel the
attendance or testimony of a witness or the production of any
relevant materials, including, without limitation, books, papers,
documents, records, photographs, recordings, reports and tangible
objects.
3. If a witness refuses to attend, testify or produce materials as
required by the subpoena, the Department may report to the district
court by petition, setting forth that:
(a) Due notice has been given of the time and place of
attendance or testimony of the witness or the production of
materials;
(b) The witness has been subpoenaed by the Department
pursuant to this section; and
(c) The witness has failed or refused to attend, testify or produce
materials before the Department as required by the subpoena, or has
refused to answer questions propounded to him or her,
 and asking for an order of the court compelling the witness to
attend, testify or produce materials before the Department.
-
*AB401*

– 29 –
4. Upon receipt of such a petition, the court shall enter an order
directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place
to be fixed by the court in its order, the time to be not more than 10
days after the date of the order, and then and there show cause
why the witness has not attended, testified or produced materials
before the Department. A certified copy of the order must be served
upon the witness.
5. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued by the Department, the court shall enter an order that the
witness appear before the Department at a time and place fixed in
the order and testify or produce materials, and that upon failure to
obey the order the witness must be dealt with as for contempt of
court.
Sec. 28. NRS 390.285 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.285 1. If a school official has reason to believe that a
violation of the plan adopted pursuant to NRS 390.275 may have
occurred, the school official shall immediately report the incident to
the board of trustees of the school district. If the board of trustees of
a school district has reason to believe that a violation of the plan
adopted pursuant to NRS 390.275 may have occurred, the board of
trustees shall:
(a) If the violation is with respect to an examination
administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 , [or the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,]
immediately report the incident to the Department orally or in
writing followed by a comprehensive written report within 14
school days after the incident occurred; and
(b) Cause to be commenced an investigation of the incident. The
board of trustees may carry out the requirements of this paragraph
by:
(1) Investigating the incident as it deems appropriate,
including, without limitation, using the powers of subpoena set forth
in this section.
(2) With respect to an examination that is administered
pursuant to NRS 390.105 , [or the college and career readiness
assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,] requesting that
the Department investigate the incident pursuant to NRS 390.280.
 The fact that a board of trustees elects initially to carry out its
own investigation pursuant to subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b)
does not affect the ability of the board of trustees to request, at any
time, that the Department investigate the incident as authorized
pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (b).
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, if the board
of trustees of a school district proceeds in accordance with
subparagraph (1) of paragraph (b) of subsection 1, the board of
-
*AB401*

– 30 –
trustees may issue a subpoena to compel the attendance or testimony
of a witness or the production of any relevant materials, including,
without limitation, books, papers, documents, records, photographs,
recordings, reports and tangible objects. A board of trustees shall
not issue a subpoena to compel the attendance or testimony of a
witness or the production of materials unless the attendance,
testimony or production sought to be compelled is related directly to
a violation or an alleged violation of the plan adopted pursuant to
NRS 390.275.
3. If a witness refuses to attend, testify or produce materials as
required by the subpoena, the board of trustees may report to the
district court by petition, setting forth that:
(a) Due notice has been given of the time and place of
attendance or testimony of the witness or the production of
materials;
(b) The witness has been subpoenaed by the board of trustees
pursuant to this section; and
(c) The witness has failed or refused to attend, testify or produce
materials before the board of trustees as required by the subpoena,
or has refused to answer questions propounded to him or her,
 and asking for an order of the court compelling the witness to
attend, testify or produce materials before the board of trustees.
4. Upon receipt of such a petition, the court shall enter an order
directing the witness to appear before the court at a time and place
to be fixed by the court in its order, the time to be not more than 10
days after the date of the order, and then and there show cause why
the witness has not attended, testified or produced materials before
the board of trustees. A certified copy of the order must be served
upon the witness.
5. If it appears to the court that the subpoena was regularly
issued by the board of trustees, the court shall enter an order that the
witness appear before the board of trustees at a time and place fixed
in the order and testify or produce materials, and that upon failure to
obey the order the witness must be dealt with as for contempt of
court.
Sec. 29. NRS 390.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.300 1. The Department shall establish a program of
education and training regarding the administration and security of
the examinations administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 . [and the
college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant to
NRS 390.610.] Upon approval of the Department, the board of
trustees of a school district or the governing body of a charter school
may establish an expanded program of education and training that
includes additional education and training if the expanded program
complies with the program established by the Department.
-
*AB401*

– 31 –
2. The board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school shall ensure that:
(a) All the teachers and other educational personnel who provide
instruction to pupils enrolled in a grade level that is required to be
tested pursuant to NRS 390.105, [390.600 or 390.610,] and all other
personnel who are involved with the administration of the
examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 , [or
the college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant
to NRS 390.610,] receive, on an annual basis, the program of
education and training established by the Department or the
expanded program, if applicable; and
(b) The training and education is otherwise available for all
personnel who are not required to receive the training and education
pursuant to paragraph (a).
Sec. 30. NRS 390.350 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.350 As used in NRS 390.350 to 390.430, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS
[390.355] 390.360 to 390.380, inclusive, have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 31. NRS 390.365 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.365 “Irregularity in testing administration” means the
failure to administer an examination [or assessment] in the manner
intended by the person or entity that created the examination . [or
assessment.]
Sec. 32. NRS 390.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.370 “Irregularity in testing security” means an act or
omission that tends to corrupt or impair the security of an
examination , [or assessment,] including, without limitation:
1. The failure to comply with security procedures adopted
pursuant to NRS 390.270 or 390.275;
2. The disclosure of questions or answers to questions on an
examination [or assessment] in a manner not otherwise approved by
law; and
3. Other breaches in the security or confidentiality of the
questions or answers to questions on an examination . [or
assessment.]
Sec. 33. NRS 390.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.600 1. The State Board shall adopt regulations that,
except as otherwise provided in subsection [3,] 2, prescribe the
criteria for a pupil to receive a standard high school diploma, which
must include, without limitation, the requirement that [:
(a) A pupil enrolled in grade 11 take the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610; and
(b) Commencing] , commencing with the graduating class of
2022 and each graduating class thereafter, a pupil successfully
-
*AB401*

– 32 –
complete a course of study designed to prepare the pupil for
graduation from high school and for readiness for college and
career.
2. [The criteria prescribed by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 for a pupil to receive a standard high school diploma
must not include the results of the pupil on the college and career
readiness assessment administered to the pupil in grade 11 pursuant
to NRS 390.610.
3.] A pupil with a disability who does not satisfy the
requirements to receive a standard high school diploma prescribed
by the State Board pursuant to subsection 1 may receive a standard
high school diploma if the pupil demonstrates, through a portfolio of
the pupil’s work, proficiency in the standards of content and
performance established by the Council to Establish Academic
Standards for Public Schools pursuant to NRS 389.520.
[4.] 3. A pupil with a disability who does not satisfy the
requirements for receipt of a standard high school diploma
prescribed in subsection [3] 2 or by the State Board pursuant to
subsection 1 may receive a diploma designated as an:
(a) Adjusted diploma if the pupil satisfies the requirements set
forth in his or her individualized education program; or
(b) Alternative diploma if the pupil:
(1) Has a significant cognitive disability; and
(2) Participates in an alternate assessment prescribed by the
State Board.
[5.] 4. If a pupil does not satisfy the requirements to receive a
standard high school diploma prescribed by subsection [3] 2 or by
the State Board pursuant to subsection 1, the pupil must not be
issued a certificate of attendance or any other document indicating
that the pupil attended high school but did not satisfy the
requirements for such a diploma. The provisions of this subsection
do not apply to a pupil who receives an adjusted diploma or an
alternative diploma pursuant to subsection [4.] 3.
[6.] 5. As used in this section, “individualized education
program” has the meaning ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. §
1414(d)(1)(A).
Sec. 34. NRS 390.840 is hereby amended to read as follows:
390.840 If the Department enters into a contract with a person
or entity to score the results of an examination that is administered
to pupils pursuant to NRS 390.105 , [or the college and career
readiness assessment administered pursuant to NRS 390.610,] and
the contract sets forth penalties or sanctions in the event that the
person or entity fails to deliver the scored results to a school district
or charter school on a timely basis, the Department shall ensure that
any such penalties or sanctions are fully enforced.
-
*AB401*

– 33 –
Sec. 35. NRS 391.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.330 1. The State Board may suspend or revoke the
license of any teacher, administrator or other licensed employee, or
may issue a letter of reprimand to any teacher, administrator or other
licensed employee, after notice and an opportunity for hearing have
been provided pursuant to NRS 391.322 and 391.323, for:
(a) Unprofessional conduct.
(b) Immorality, as defined in NRS 391.650.
(c) Evident unfitness for service.
(d) Physical or mental incapacity which renders the teacher,
administrator or other licensed employee unfit for service.
(e) Conviction of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude.
(f) Conviction of a sex offense under NRS 200.366, 200.368,
201.190, 201.220, 201.230, 201.540 or 201.560 in which a pupil
enrolled in a school of a county school district was the victim.
(g) Conviction of a violation of NRS 201.553.
(h) Knowingly advocating the overthrow of the Federal
Government or of the State of Nevada by force, violence or
unlawful means.
(i) Persistent defiance of or refusal to obey the regulations of the
State Board, the Commission or the Superintendent of Public
Instruction, defining and governing the duties of teachers,
administrators and other licensed employees.
(j) Breaches in the security or confidentiality of the questions
and answers of the examinations that are administered pursuant to
NRS 390.105 . [and the college and career readiness assessment
administered pursuant to NRS 390.610.]
(k) Intentional failure to observe and carry out the requirements
of a plan to ensure the security of examinations [and assessments]
adopted pursuant to NRS 390.270 or 390.275.
(l) An intentional violation of NRS 388.497 or 388.499.
(m) Knowingly and willfully failing to comply with the
provisions of NRS 388.1351.
(n) A substantiated report of abuse or neglect of a child, as
defined in NRS 432B.020, or a violation of NRS 201.540, 201.553,
201.560, 392.4633 or 394.366 made against the applicant in any
state.
2. The State Board shall adopt regulations governing the
process by which a letter of reprimand may be issued to a teacher,
administrator or other licensed employee pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, regulations concerning the time period
during which a letter of reprimand will remain on the record of the
teacher, administrator or other licensed employee.
3. A teacher, administrator or other licensed employee whose
license is suspended pursuant to this section:
-
*AB401*

– 34 –
(a) May apply to reinstate his or her license after the period of
suspension, as determined by the State Board, is completed; and
(b) If he or she applies to reinstate his or her license pursuant to
paragraph (a), shall:
(1) Submit a new application for licensure to the Department;
and
(2) Pay the appropriate fee for licensure.
4. A teacher, administrator or other licensed employee whose
license is revoked may not apply to reinstate his or her license and
the Department shall not grant a new license to such a person.
Sec. 36. NRS 391.750 is hereby amended to read as follows:
391.750 1. A teacher may be suspended, dismissed or not
reemployed and an administrator may be demoted, suspended,
dismissed or not reemployed for the following reasons:
(a) Inefficiency;
(b) Immorality;
(c) Unprofessional conduct;
(d) Insubordination;
(e) Neglect of duty;
(f) Physical or mental incapacity;
(g) A justifiable decrease in the number of positions due to
decreased enrollment or district reorganization;
(h) Conviction of a felony or of a crime involving moral
turpitude;
(i) Inadequate performance;
(j) Evident unfitness for service;
(k) Failure to comply with such reasonable requirements as a
board may prescribe;
(l) Failure to show normal improvement and evidence of
professional training and growth;
(m) Advocating overthrow of the Government of the United
States or of the State of Nevada by force, violence or other unlawful
means, or the advocating or teaching of communism with the intent
to indoctrinate pupils to subscribe to communistic philosophy;
(n) Any cause which constitutes grounds for the revocation of a
teacher’s license;
(o) Willful neglect or failure to observe and carry out the
requirements of this title;
(p) Dishonesty;
(q) Intentional failure to observe and carry out the requirements
of a plan to ensure the security of examinations [and assessments]
adopted pursuant to NRS 390.270 or 390.275;
(r) An intentional violation of NRS 388.497 or 388.499;
(s) Knowingly and willfully failing to comply with the
provisions of NRS 388.1351;
-
*AB401*

– 35 –
(t) Knowingly and willfully violating any provision of NRS
391.850 to 391.930, inclusive;
(u) Gross misconduct; or
(v) An intentional failure to report a violation of NRS 388.135 if
the teacher or administrator witnessed the violation.
2. If a teacher or administrator is found, through an
investigation of a testing irregularity, to have willfully breached the
security or confidentiality of the questions and answers of the
examinations that are administered pursuant to NRS 390.105 , [or
the college and career readiness assessment administered pursuant
to NRS 390.610,] the board of trustees of a school district,
governing body of a charter school or governing body of a
university school for profoundly gifted pupils, as applicable, shall:
(a) Suspend, dismiss or fail to reemploy the teacher; or
(b) Demote, suspend, dismiss or fail to reemploy the
administrator.
3. In determining whether the professional performance of a
licensed employee is inadequate, consideration must be given to the
regular and special evaluation reports prepared in accordance with
the policy of the employing school district and to any written
standards of performance which may have been adopted by the
board.
4. As used in this section, “gross misconduct” includes any act
or omission that is in wanton, willful, reckless or deliberate
disregard of the interests of a school or school district or a pupil
thereof.
Sec. 37. NRS 390.355, 390.610 and 390.620 are hereby
repealed.
Sec. 38. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2026.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTIONS
390.355 “Assessment” defined. “Assessment” means the
college and career readiness assessment administered to pupils in
grade 11 pursuant to NRS 390.610.
-
*AB401*

– 36 –
390.610 State Board to select college and career readiness
assessment for grade 11; requirement of pupil to take
assessment; results not used for receipt of standard high school
diploma; use of results to provide data and information for
pupil; adoption of regulations prescribing manner in which
results must be used to inform instruction to pupils in grade 12.
1. The State Board shall select a college and career readiness
assessment for administration to pupils who are enrolled in grade 11
in public high schools.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a pupil must
take the college and career readiness assessment to receive a
standard high school diploma. A pupil with a disability may, in
accordance with his or her individualized education program, be
exempt from the requirement to take the college and career
readiness assessment.
3. The results of a pupil on the college and career readiness
assessment:
(a) Must not be used in the determination of whether the pupil
satisfies the requirements for receipt of standard high school
diploma.
(b) May be used in the determination of whether the pupil
satisfies the requirements for receipt of a college and career ready
high school diploma.
4. The assessment selected pursuant to subsection 1 must be:
(a) Administered at the same time during the school year by the
board of trustees of each school district to pupils enrolled in grade
in all public high schools of the school district and by the
governing body of each charter school that enrolls pupils in grade
11, as prescribed by the State Board, and in accordance with
uniform procedures adopted by the State Board. The Department
shall monitor the compliance of the school districts and individual
schools with the uniform procedures and report to the State Board
any instance of noncompliance.
(b) Administered in accordance with the plan adopted by the
Department pursuant to NRS 390.270 and with the plan adopted by
the board of trustees of the school district in which the assessment is
administered pursuant to NRS 390.275. The Department shall
monitor the compliance of the school districts and individual
schools with:
(1) The plan adopted by the Department; and
(2) The plan adopted by the board of trustees of the
applicable school district, to the extent that the plan adopted by the
board of trustees of the school district is consistent with the plan
adopted by the Department,
-
*AB401*

– 37 –
 and shall report to the State Board any instance of
noncompliance.
5. The assessment selected pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be used to provide data and information to each pupil who
takes the assessment in a manner that allows the pupil to review the
areas of his or her academic strengths and weaknesses, including,
without limitation, areas where additional work in the subject areas
tested on the assessment is necessary to prepare for college and
career success without the need for remediation; and
(b) Allow teachers and other educational personnel to use the
results of a pupil on the assessment to provide appropriate
interventions for the pupil to prepare for college and career success.
6. The Department shall ensure the availability of authorized
supports to pupils who are English learners for the assessment
selected pursuant to subsection 1.
7. The State Board shall adopt regulations prescribing the
manner in which the results of a college and career readiness
assessment selected pursuant to subsection 1 must be used by a
school district or charter school that operates as a high school to
inform the instruction provided to pupils enrolled in grade 12,
including, without limitation, to determine whether to provide
remediation in areas of academic weakness and acceleration in areas
of academic strength.
8. The State Board may work in consultation with the boards of
trustees of school districts and, if a charter school enrolls pupils at a
high school grade level, the governing body of the charter school to
develop and implement appropriate plans of remediation for pupils
based upon the results of the pupils on the assessment.
390.620 Department required to develop and post on
Internet website informational pamphlet concerning college and
career readiness assessment; posting of pamphlet and
distribution to pupils and parents.
1. The Department shall develop an informational pamphlet
concerning the college and career readiness assessment administered
pursuant to NRS 390.610 for pupils who are enrolled in junior high,
middle school and high school, and their parents and legal
guardians. The pamphlet must include a written explanation of the:
(a) Importance of taking the college and career readiness
assessment;
(b) Subject areas tested on the college and career readiness
assessment; and
(c) Format for the college and career readiness assessment,
including, without limitation, the range of items that is contained on
the assessment.
-
*AB401*

– 38 –
2. The Department shall review the pamphlet on an annual
basis and make such revisions to the pamphlet as it considers
necessary to ensure that pupils and their parents or legal guardians
fully understand the college and career readiness assessment.
3. On or before September 1, the Department shall:
(a) Provide an electronic copy of the pamphlet or revised
pamphlet to the board of trustees of each school district and the
governing body of each charter school that includes pupils enrolled
in a junior high, middle school or high school grade level; and
(b) Post a copy of the pamphlet or revised pamphlet on the
Internet website maintained by the Department.
4. The board of trustees of each school district shall provide a
copy of the pamphlet to each junior high, middle school or high
school within the school district for posting. The governing body of
each charter school shall ensure that a copy of the pamphlet is
posted at the charter school. Each principal of a junior high, middle
school, high school or charter school shall ensure that the teachers,
counselors and administrators employed at the school fully
understand the contents of the pamphlet.
5. On or before October 1, the:
(a) Board of trustees of each school district shall provide a copy
of the pamphlet to each pupil who is enrolled in a junior high,
middle school or high school of the school district and to the parents
or legal guardians of such a pupil.
(b) Governing body of each charter school shall provide a copy
of the pamphlet to each pupil who is enrolled in the charter school at
a junior high, middle school or high school grade level and to the
parents or legal guardians of such a pupil.
H
-
*AB401*